California statutes. Public Resources Code
On and after January 1, 2028, only reusable or refillable propane cylinders shall be sold or offered for sale in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (SB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42395.2.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter with an effective date of January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (SB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Retreaded Tire Program [42400. - 42416.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42400. - 42401.]

42400.

The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42401.

“Retreaded tire” means any tire that utilizes an existing casing for the purpose of vulcanizing new tread to such casing which meets all performance and quality standards specified in the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards determined by the United States Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Retreaded Tire Program [42410. - 42416.]

42410.

The board shall evaluate current state and federal quality standards for retreaded tires and identify the obstacles for an increased market for retreads. The results of this evaluation and the activities that the board will undertake to increase the use of retreaded tires shall be included in the reporting requirements specified in Section 42950.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42411.

The Department of General Services and the board, in consultation with representatives of the California retreading industry, shall adopt specifications for the purchase of retreaded tires by the State of California. The specifications shall designate the state minimum quality standards for retreaded tires. The specifications shall be designed to maximize the use of retreads without jeopardizing the safety of the occupants of the vehicle or the intended end use of the tire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1156, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

42412.

On or before July 1, 1991, and to the extent that existing stock shall be utilized first, all tires for use on state vehicles issued for short-term use through Fleet Administration shall, at the next required installation of tires, be equipped with retreaded tires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42413.

Emergency vehicles, as defined in Section 165 of the California Vehicle Code are exempt from this provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42414.

The number of retreaded tires purchased annually by the Department of General Services during each fiscal year shall be tabulated and forwarded to the board by August 31 every year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 20.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

42415.

The board, in consultation with the Department of General Services, shall perform a study to determine if the retreads, procured by the Department of General Services, have met all quality and performance criteria of a new tire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 21.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

42416.

On or before July 1, 1991, the board shall, in consultation with the retreading industry, develop a procedure to estimate the number of retreads sold in California. This information, in addition to other facts compiled on the utilization of retread tires, shall be used to evaluate the effectiveness of this program. The results of that evaluation shall be included in the report required pursuant to Section 40507.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Responsible Battery Recycling Act of 2022 [42420. - 42428.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [42420. - 42420.4.]

42420.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Responsible Battery Recycling Act of 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42420.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Brand” means a trademark, including both a registered trademark and an unregistered trademark, a logo, a name, a symbol, a word, an identifier, or a traceable mark that identifies a covered battery and identifies the owner or licensee of the brand.

(b) “Collection site” means a permanent or temporary location at which covered batteries are collected and prepared for transport in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(c) “Consumer” means an owner of a covered battery, including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or
 governmental entity, and includes the ultimate purchaser, owner, or lessee of a covered battery, who is not, as to that covered battery, the distributor, importer, producer, recycler, retailer, or stewardship organization.

(d) (1) “Covered battery” means a device consisting of one or more electrically connected electrochemical cells designed to receive, store, and deliver electric energy. A covered battery includes a battery that is any of the following:

(A) A loose battery that is either sold separately from a product or that is designed to be easily removed from a product by the user of the product, with no more than common household tools.

(B) A battery that is packed with, but not installed in, the product that the battery is intended to power, when the product is offered for sale by the
 producer.

(2) “Covered battery” does not include any of the following:

(A) A primary battery weighing over two kilograms. For purposes of this subparagraph, “primary battery” means a nonrechargeable battery, including, but not limited to, alkaline, carbon-zinc, and lithium metal batteries.

(B) A rechargeable battery weighing over five kilograms and having a Watt-hour rating of more than 300 Watt-hours.

(C) A lead-acid battery, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 42440.

(D) (i) A battery contained in a motor vehicle. For purposes of this subparagraph, “motor vehicle” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, the exclusion in clause (i) does not apply to a battery contained in any of the following:

(I) A motorized scooter.

(II) A motorized skateboard.

(III) A motorized hoverboard.

(IV) A device intended to propel or move upon a highway only one individual person or property.

(E) A fuel cell electrical generating facility. For purposes of this subparagraph, “fuel cell electrical generating facility” has the same meaning as “eligible fuel cell electrical generating facility,” as defined in Section 2827.10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(F) (i) A Class I device as defined in Section 360c of Title 21 of the United States Code, and either of the following applies:

(I) It is a device described in Section 414.202 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(II) Either of the following applies:

(ia) The device is predominantly used in a health care setting by a provider.

(ib) The device is predominantly prescribed by a health care provider.

(ii) A Class II or Class III device as defined in Section 360c of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(G) A battery that has been recalled.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery or a successor agency.

(f) “Distributor” means a company that has a contractual relationship with one or more producers to market and sell covered batteries to retailers.

(g) “Electrochemical cell” means a system consisting of an anode, a cathode, and an electrolyte, plus electrical or mechanical connections needed to allow the cell to deliver or receive electric energy.

(h) “Importer” means either of the following:

(1) A person qualifying as an importer of record for purposes of Section 1484(a)(2)(B) of Title 19 of the United States Code with regard to the import of a covered battery that is sold, distributed for sale, or
 offered for sale in or into the state that was manufactured or assembled by a company outside of the United States.

(2) A person importing into the state for sale, distributing for sale, or offering for sale in the state a covered battery that was manufactured or assembled by a company physically located outside of the state.

(i) “Person” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 40170.

(j) (1) “Producer” means a person who manufactures a covered battery and who owns or is the licensee of the brand or trademark under which that covered battery is sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in or into the state.

(2) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1), the producer of the
 covered battery is the owner of a brand or trademark or, if the owner is not in the state, the exclusive licensee of a brand or trademark under which the covered battery is sold, imported for sale, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in or into the state. For purposes of this subdivision, an exclusive licensee is a person holding the exclusive right to use a trademark or brand in the state in connection with the manufacture, sale, or distribution for sale in or into the state of the covered battery.

(3) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), the producer of the covered battery is the person who sells, offers for sale, or is the importer or distributor of the covered battery in or into the state for sale in or into the state.

(4) For purposes of this chapter, the sale of a covered battery shall be deemed to occur in the
 state if the covered battery is delivered to the purchaser in the state.

(5) “Producer” does not include an admitted insurer possessing a certificate of authority from the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Section 700 of the Insurance Code, nor does it apply to a placement of insurance that was made in full compliance with Section 1765.1 or 1765.2 of the Insurance Code.

(k) “Program operator” means a producer, or a stewardship organization on behalf of a group of producers, that is responsible for implementing a stewardship program in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(l) (1) “Rechargeable battery” means a battery that contains one or more voltaic or galvanic cells, electrically connected to produce electric energy, and that is designed to be recharged.

(2) “Rechargeable battery” does not include either of the following:

(A) A battery that contains electrolytes as a free liquid.

(B) A battery that employs lead-acid technology, unless that battery is sealed and contains no free liquid electrolytes.

(m) “Recycler” means a person who changes the physical or chemical composition of covered batteries.

(n) “Recycling” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 25121.1 of the Health and Safety Code. “Recycling” does not include any of the following:

(1) Combustion.

(2) Incineration.

(3) Energy generation.

(4) Fuel production.

(5) Beneficial reuse in the construction and operation of a solid waste landfill, including use of alternative daily cover.

(6) Other forms of disposal, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 40192.

(o) “Recycling efficiency rate” means the ratio of the weight of covered battery components recycled by a program operator from covered batteries to the weight of those covered batteries collected by the program operator.

(p) “Retailer” means a person who sells or offers for sale covered batteries in or into the state to a person through any means, including, but not limited to, sales
 outlets, catalogs, the telephone, the internet, or any electronic means.

(q) “Stewardship organization” means an organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) that is established by a group of producers in accordance with this chapter to develop and implement a stewardship program.

(r) “Stewardship plan” or “plan” means a plan developed by a program operator pursuant to this chapter for the collection, transportation, and recycling, and the safe and proper management, of covered batteries.

(s) “Stewardship program” means a program established by a program operator pursuant to this chapter for the free at drop off, convenient, and safe collection, transportation, recycling, and otherwise proper management of covered
 batteries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 192.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42420.2.

The department, acting in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 11340) to Article 8 (commencing with Section 11350), inclusive, of the Administrative Procedure Act, as set forth in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter with an effective date of no earlier than April 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42420.3.

(a) The department may adjust, through regulations adopted by the department, the minimum required collection sites, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42422.1, to ensure that consumers have sufficient convenient access to collection sites, applicable to stewardship plans addressing collection of covered batteries if the department has substantial evidence that allowing for this adjustment will increase the collection of covered batteries.

(b) The department shall establish, through regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42420.2, a limit on the number of covered batteries to be deposited at a single collection site, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42422.1, as applicable, by a single consumer in a single day.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2032, and every five years thereafter, the department may after consultation with the program operators and through regulations adopted by the department adjust the minimum recycling efficiency rates established in Section 42422.1 based on the most economically and technically feasible processes and methodology available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 193.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42420.4.

(a) (1) A program operator shall include as a collection site under its stewardship program any entity that offers in writing to participate in the stewardship program, complies with all applicable state, federal, and municipal laws and regulations, complies with any program operator requirements that are consistent with that program operator’s approved stewardship plan, and is judged by the program operator to have sufficient staff and resources to reliably comply, even if the minimum thresholds described in subdivision (d) of Section 42422.1, as applicable, have been achieved.

(2) A program operator shall include as a collection site under its stewardship program any household hazardous waste collection facility, as
 defined in Section 25218.1 of the Health and Safety Code, that offers in writing to participate in the stewardship program, complies with all applicable state, federal, and municipal laws and regulations, and complies with any program operator requirements that are consistent with that program operator’s approved stewardship plan, even if the minimum thresholds described in subdivision (d) of Section 42422.1, as applicable, have been achieved.

(b) A program operator shall include the offering entity as a collection site in the stewardship program within 90 days of receiving the written offer to participate, confirming that the offering entity will comply with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, and confirming that the offering entity has sufficient staff and resources to comply with any program operator requirements that are consistent with that program operator’s approved stewardship plan, even if the minimum thresholds
 described in subdivision (d) of Section 42422.1, as applicable, have been achieved. The program operator shall not be required to respond to offers pursuant to this paragraph until the program operator’s stewardship plan has been approved by the department.

(c) A program operator may suspend or terminate a collection site or service that does not comply with all applicable state, federal, or municipal laws and regulations or adhere to the rules and conditions imposed by the program operator pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 42422.1.

(d) A collection site shall be operated to ensure that covered batteries, as applicable, are collected safely and handled in accordance with all applicable state, federal, and municipal laws and regulations and the rules and conditions of the stewardship plan.

(e) This section does not exempt the program operator from meeting the minimum thresholds described in subdivision (d) of Section 42422.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Operators for Covered Batteries [42421. - 42421.2.]

42421.

(a) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this chapter, individual producers shall provide to the department, in a form and manner established by the department, a list of covered batteries and brands of covered batteries that the producer sells, distributes for sale, imports for sale, or offers for sale in or into the state.

(b) A program operator shall update the list described in subdivision (a) and provide the updated list to the department on or before January 15 of each year or upon request of the department, with at least 60 days to respond after a request from the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42421.2.

(a) Producers may establish one or more stewardship organizations composed of producers to develop and implement a covered battery recycling program.

(b) (1) A producer shall comply with this chapter, and any effective regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42420.2, either individually or through a stewardship organization established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A producer shall not sell, distribute for sale, offer for sale, or import for sale a covered battery in or into this state unless the producer is in compliance with this chapter and any regulations in effect and adopted pursuant to Section 42420.2.

(3) Every producer shall, no later than 180 days after the effective date of this chapter, notify all persons through which it is selling, distributing, importing, or offering for sale a covered battery in or into the state for sale in or into the state whether it will comply with this chapter individually or through a stewardship organization.

(c) Each producer covered under a stewardship organization shall register with that stewardship organization in accordance with the procedures and requirements established by that stewardship organization and shall comply with those procedures and requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Stewardship Plans for Covered Batteries [42422. - 42422.6.]

42422.

Within 12 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42420.2, a program operator shall develop and submit to the department a complete stewardship plan, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, for the collection, transportation, and recycling, and the safe and proper management, of covered batteries in the state in an economically efficient and practical manner. No stewardship program serving more than one producer may limit its collection, transportation, and recycling of covered batteries to covered batteries of the producers participating in that stewardship program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42422.1.

A stewardship plan for covered batteries shall include all of the following:

(a) The names of producers, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 42420.1, and brands of covered batteries covered under the stewardship plan.

(b) A description of the process by which the program operator consulted with the advisory body created pursuant to Section 42422.4 to receive advice on the development and implementation of the stewardship plan.

(c) A description of methodologies for measuring, and meeting or exceeding, the established minimum recycling efficiency rate for primary and rechargeable batteries to meet the annual report requirement in subdivision (i) of
 Section 42424.1.

(d) A description of how the program operator will provide for a free at drop off and convenient collection system for covered batteries in each county of the state that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) A minimum of 10 collection sites per county or one collection site per 15,000 people, whichever is greater, except as identified below:

(A) A county with a population of 18,000 and under, as reported annually by the Department of Finance, shall have a minimum of three collection locations.

(B) A county with a population of between 18,001 and 50,000, as reported annually by the Department of Finance, shall have a minimum of four collection locations.

(C) A county
 with a population between 50,001 and 100,000, as reported annually by the Department of Finance, shall have a minimum of eight collection locations.

(2) The collection sites required by this subdivision shall not be required to collect covered batteries that are damaged, defective, or recalled.

(3) The collection sites in each county shall be spread throughout the county to facilitate widespread access and convenience. This paragraph does not authorize the department to require more than the minimum number of collection sites required pursuant to paragraph (1) or the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42420.2.

(e) A description of how collection sites will be authorized and managed, including both of the following:

(1) An
 explanation of the process by which the program operator will, upon request, provide to a household hazardous waste collection facility as defined in Section 25218.1 of the Health and Safety Code, at no cost, and to all other collection sites, at cost, packaging consistent with the requirements found in the United States Department of Transportation’s hazardous materials regulations and the necessary forms and instructions for the safe collection and transportation of damaged or defective covered batteries.

(2) An explanation of the process by which the program operator will provide for the collection and transport of covered batteries from the collection sites to a recycler and how shipments will be documented. A program operator shall maintain these records and make them available to the department upon request.

(f) A program operator shall allow a consumer to drop off at a
 collection site, at no charge at drop off, covered batteries.

(g) A description of how the program operator will provide collection sites at no cost to the collection sites with appropriate containers for covered batteries subject to its program, training, signage, safety guidance, and educational materials.

(h) All handling, collection, transport, and recycling of covered batteries undertaken as part of a stewardship program under this chapter shall comply with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, but the department may not take enforcement action under this chapter against a program operator for failure to comply with those state and federal laws and regulations unless the program operator is first determined to have violated the applicable state or federal law or regulation by the governing body with jurisdiction to enforce the state or federal law or
 regulation.

(i) A retailer with five or more locations in the state shall make all locations serve as permanent collection sites for covered batteries, and shall comply with the rules and conditions of the program in which it participates, as part of a stewardship program.

(j) No program operator shall be required, as a condition of approval of its plan or program or otherwise, to accept damaged, defective, or recalled batteries at sites served by the program operator. Program operators shall provide to sites participating in their programs, information for persons seeking to recycle damaged or defective batteries informing those persons of the requirements for doing so and of the closest location at which damaged or defective batteries may be accepted. Program operators shall provide to sites participating in their programs information for persons seeking to recycle recalled
 batteries informing those persons of instructions to contact any entity recalling batteries to determine the appropriate handling of those batteries.

(k) (1) A description of the method to establish and administer a means for fully funding the stewardship program in a manner that equitably distributes the stewardship program’s costs among the producers that are part of the stewardship organization. For producers that elect to meet the requirements of this chapter individually, without joining a stewardship organization, a description of the proposed method to establish and administer a means for fully funding the stewardship program.

(2) The stewardship plan shall include a stewardship program budget, for the next three calendar years, that includes a funding level and anticipated revenues and costs sufficient to cover the budgeted costs, including, but not
 limited to, administrative costs, operational costs, and capital costs, to operate the stewardship program in a prudent and responsible manner. Administrative costs shall include the department’s and the Department of Toxic Substances Control’s anticipated actual, reasonable, and direct regulatory costs to implement and enforce this chapter as the criteria for all the costs are defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42420.2. For purposes of this paragraph, stewardship program implementation begins once the department approves a program operator’s stewardship plan, except the department’s and the Department of Toxic Substances Control’s costs shall include actual, reasonable, and direct regulatory development costs and other startup regulatory costs incurred prior to stewardship plan submittal and approval.

(l) A description of the process by which covered batteries will be processed and recycled following collection at
 collection sites, including all of the following:

(1) A description of how covered batteries will be handled and recycled, including how covered batteries will not be disposed of by the program operator and a description of how the recycling of all covered batteries will be maximized.

(2) A description of how discarded covered battery residual materials will, to the extent economically and technically feasible, be recycled and a description of how contracts with service providers will require that this be done and how the contractor will accomplish this.

(3) A description of how the program operator will prioritize the use of recycling facilities located closer to the point of generation to minimize transportation emissions and increase accountability.

(m) Coordination with, and a description of the efforts and methods used to coordinate activities with, all of the following entities who are responsive to a request from the program operator:

(1) Other program operators.

(2) Existing battery collection and recycling programs, including electronic waste recyclers and dismantlers.

(3) Community-based organizations that contact the program operator and that are qualified to run or support collection events.

(n) Consultation with the California Environmental Protection Agency’s Environmental Justice Task Force regarding methods to supplement those of the program operator to collect covered batteries for recycling in areas and communities that face unique challenges associated with proper waste
 management, such as poverty, language barriers, and illegal disposal.

(o) A comprehensive statewide education and outreach program designed to educate consumers and promote participation in the collection and recycling program offered by the program operator. At a minimum, the comprehensive statewide education and outreach program shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the education and communications strategy being implemented to effectively promote participation in the approved covered battery stewardship program and provide the information necessary for effective participation of consumers, retailers, and others.

(2) An internet website that publicizes the location of collection sites and provides information to consumers on the free at drop off and convenient network of collection sites offered
 by the stewardship program and any other information reasonably necessary to safely and conveniently access the collection and recycling services offered in the state.

(3) All signage and materials required for collection sites by the program operator, and the method by which collection sites can access replacement materials at no cost to the collection site.

(4) A description of efforts to support participation by all California communities, including a description of efforts to communicate with consumers in languages other than English, as described in subdivision (n).

(5) A description of goals and metrics used to determine the success of the statewide education and outreach program.

(6) The statewide education and outreach program shall promote the
 safe and proper management of covered batteries.

(7) The statewide education and outreach program shall not promote the disposal of covered batteries in a manner inconsistent with the services offered by the stewardship plan.

(8) The statewide education and outreach plan shall include information for consumers about how to avoid improper disposal of covered batteries.

(9) A description of how the program operators will annually assess and evaluate the efficacy of the comprehensive statewide education and outreach program and periodically adjust strategies to maximize participation in the stewardship program.

(10) (A) Any program operator serving more than one producer shall coordinate with other program operators on the education
 and outreach programs that they implement pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) The department may approve multiple program operators sharing, on an equitable basis, the costs of implementing elements of the program that benefit all approved plans serving more than one producer and the program operators sponsoring them, except those costs specified in paragraphs (2) and (9).

(p) Developing strategies in coordination with other program operators to develop and implement proper labeling of covered batteries to ensure proper collection and recycling, by identifying the chemistry of the covered battery and including an indication that the covered battery should not be disposed of as household waste.

(q) A contingency plan in the event the stewardship plan expires, is disapproved, or is revoked. The contingency plan shall
 describe how the stewardship plan objectives can be carried out in the absence of a plan, either by the program operator or through an entity such as an escrow company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 194.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42422.3.

(a) A program operator shall review its stewardship plan at least every five years after the stewardship plan approval, and determine whether revisions to the plan are necessary.

(b) If a program operator determines that revisions to the plan are necessary, the program operator shall submit to the department a revised plan for review and approval employing the procedures set forth in Section 42422.5. The stewardship organization shall submit the revised plan pursuant to this subdivision within 90 days of the review deadline outlined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) If a program operator determines that no revisions to the plan are necessary, the program operator shall send a
 letter to the department no later than 30 days after the review deadline outlined in subdivision (a), explaining that the program operator has reviewed the plan and determined that no revisions are needed. The department may disapprove the program operator’s determination within 30 days of receipt of that determination if the department concludes that the program operator cannot implement the objectives of this chapter without revising the stewardship plan. In the event the department disapproves the program operator’s determination, the program operator shall submit to the department a revised stewardship plan for review and approval in accordance with Section 42422.5. The program operator shall submit the revised plan pursuant to this subdivision within 90 days of receipt of the department’s disapproval.

(d) Notwithstanding the requirement in subdivision (a) of Section 42422.5, a program operator may, but is not required to, submit its plan
 to the Department of Toxic Substances Control prior to submission to the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42422.4.

(a) In preparing a stewardship plan pursuant to Section 42422.1, and any updates to the plan pursuant to Section 42422.3, a program operator shall engage in a consultative process with the advisory body created by the department pursuant to subdivision (b). The program operator shall consider any written recommendations from the advisory body during the plan development process.

(b) (1) No later than 120 days after the effective date of regulations, pursuant to Section 42420.2, the department shall create an advisory body for covered battery stewardship that may include, but is not limited to, representatives from local governments, recyclers, retailers, the household hazardous waste industry, nongovernmental
 organizations, environmental organizations, community-based justice and public health organizations, and the solid waste industry.

(2) Participation on the advisory body shall be voluntary.

(3) The advisory body is not a state body for purposes of Section 11121 of the Government Code, but shall provide advanced public notice about meetings, allow public participation in all meetings, and vote on written recommendations at public meetings.

(c) A program operator shall consider the advisory body’s recommendations.   If the producer or stewardship organization decides not to incorporate the advisory body’s recommendations, the program operator shall provide a brief written explanation to the department and the advisory body that explains the basis for the decision and also indicates whether the program operator plans to
 incorporate the recommendations into a subsequent stewardship plan, subsequent amendments to the plan, or a subsequent annual report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42422.5.

(a) (1) At least 150 days before submitting a stewardship plan to the department, a program operator shall submit its entire proposed stewardship plan to the Department of Toxic Substances Control for review.

(2) The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall review the plan only for compliance with state and federal laws and regulations within its jurisdiction. The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall identify any elements of the proposed stewardship plan that would, if implemented, violate state or federal laws or regulations within its jurisdiction, and provide to the program operator, and the department, that determination and an explanation for any determination of noncompliance within 90 days of receipt of the plan. The
 program operator shall resolve all determinations by the Department of Toxic Substances Control prior to submitting the stewardship plan to the department.

(3) If, 90 days after submitting a plan to the Department of Toxic Substances Control, a program operator has not received a response, the program operator may submit a certification to the department that the stewardship plan was submitted to the Department of Toxic Substances Control, as required, and a timely response was not received. Additionally, if a response is not received pursuant to the first sentence of this paragraph, the program operator shall submit a certification to the department that the stewardship plan is consistent with the laws and regulations within the jurisdiction of the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(4) A program operator shall submit to the department all determinations received from the
 Department of Toxic Substances Control when the program operator submits its stewardship plan to the department. Any determination of noncompliance by the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall be accompanied by a superseding determination of compliance before a program operator submits its stewardship plan to the department.

(b) The department shall review the stewardship plan for compliance with this chapter and shall approve, disapprove, or conditionally approve the plan within 120 days of receipt of the plan. The department may consult with or submit a stewardship plan for review to the Department of Toxic Substances Control if the department determines it is necessary for making a determination of approval of a stewardship plan. The duration of time the department takes for the consultation pursuant to the second sentence of this subdivision shall not count toward the 120-day time limit to determine approval, as specified in the
 first sentence of this subdivision.

(c) If the department disapproves a stewardship plan submitted by a program operator, the department shall explain how the stewardship plan does not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the program operator within 30 days of disapproval. The program operator may resubmit to the department a revised stewardship plan within 60 days of the date the written notice was issued, and the department shall review the revised stewardship plan within 90 days of resubmittal. If a revised stewardship plan is disapproved by the department, a producer operating under the stewardship plan shall not be in compliance with this chapter until the department approves a stewardship plan submitted by a program operator that covers the producer’s products.

(d) Within 24 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant
 to Section 42420.2, a program operator shall have a complete stewardship plan approved by the department and each producer shall be subject to an approved stewardship plan in order to be in compliance with this chapter.
